Connecticut, session 2026, SB00099.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 229 of the general statutes be amended to (1) establish a
refundable credit against the personal income tax for the amount of
motor vehicle property tax paid for a taxable year by taxpayers with
adjusted gross income of less than one hundred thousand dollars for
single filers and less than two hundred thousand dollars for married
individuals filing jointly, and (2) limit the credit under section 12-704c
of the general statutes to property tax paid on primary residences.